Tennessee, session 114, HB2298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-102(a), is amended by
deleting the language "Involved the use or display of a deadly weapon" and substituting
"Involved the use, display, or brandishing of a deadly weapon".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-11-106(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) "Brandish" means to wave or exhibit a weapon in a manner that would be
found by a reasonable person to indicate a threat to use the weapon;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2298
012585
- 1 -